New York, session 2025-2026, S8140.
do enact as follows:
1 Section 1. The opening paragraphs of subdivisions a and h of section
2 343 of the retirement and social security law, the opening paragraph of
3 subdivision a as amended by chapter 533 of the laws of 2015 and the
4 opening paragraph of subdivision h as amended by chapter 717 of the laws
5 of 2023, are amended to read as follows:
6 Notwithstanding any other provision of law providing for transfers,
7 any member of any retirement system maintained by the state or a munici-
8 pality thereof, operating on a sound financial basis and subject to the
9 supervision of the department of financial services of this state may
10 transfer [his or her] their membership pursuant to this section to the
11 New York state and local employees' retirement system, the New York city
12 board of education employees' retirement system, the New York state
13 teachers' retirement system, the New York state and local police and
14 fire retirement system or to the New York city employees' retirement
15 system. Any member of the New York state and local police and fire
16 retirement system may transfer [his or her] their membership to any
17 retirement system, other than the hospital retirement system, which is
18 operating on a sound basis and is subject to the supervision of the
19 department of financial services of this state. Any police officer
EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets
[ ] is old law to be omitted.
LBD09913-04-6

S. 8140--B 2
1 employed by the metropolitan transportation authority who is a member of
2 the MTA police twenty year retirement program of the metropolitan trans-
3 portation authority defined benefit pension plan (hereinafter referred
4 to in this section as the "MTA police retirement program") may transfer
5 [his or her] their membership in the New York state and local police and
6 fire retirement system and/or the New York city police pension fund to
7 the MTA police retirement program or may transfer their membership in
8 the MTA police retirement program to any of the systems or funds refer-
9 enced in this sentence. Any police officer who was employed by the
10 metropolitan transportation authority, the Long Island Railroad Company
11 or the Metro-North Commuter Railroad Company and who is a member of the
12 MTA police retirement program may transfer [his or her] their membership
13 in the MTA police retirement program to the New York state and local
14 police and fire retirement system. Any transfer pursuant to this section
15 may be effectuated only if the member has accepted a position in another
16 branch of the state or municipal service which would make it:
17 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, with
18 respect to transfers pursuant to this section which occur on or after
19 the effective date of [the] chapter seven hundred seventeen of the laws
20 of two thousand twenty-three [that amended this subdivision], no deter-
21 mination of a reserve pursuant to subdivision c of this section or
22 transfer thereof pursuant to the first sentence of subdivision d of this
23 section shall be required in the case of any transfer pursuant to this
24 section (other than a transfer from the New York state and local police
25 and fire retirement system to either (1) the New York city police
26 department subchapter two pension fund, (2) the New York city fire
27 department subchapter two pension fund or (3) the MTA police retirement
28 program or a transfer from either (i) the New York city police depart-
29 ment subchapter two pension fund or (ii) the New York city fire depart-
30 ment subchapter two pension fund to either (A) the New York state and
31 local police and fire retirement system or (B) the MTA police retirement
32 program or a transfer from the MTA police retirement program to the New
33 York state and local police and fire retirement system or (C) the New
34 York city police department subchapter two pension fund) in the case of
35 a member with less than ten years of credited service with the trans-
36 ferring retirement system at the time the transfer is initiated. With
37 respect to transfers pursuant to such subdivisions which occur on or
38 after the effective date of [the] chapter seven hundred seventeen of the
39 laws of two thousand twenty-three [that amended this subdivision], the
40 transfer of a pension reserve shall be required when the member is
41 transferring ten or more years of credited service from a public retire-
42 ment system of the state to any other public retirement system of the
43 state, excluding any transfers within and between the New York city
44 employees' retirement system, the New York city teachers' retirement
45 system and the New York city board of education retirement system. For
46 the purpose of giving the transferring member such status and crediting
47 such service in the second retirement system as such member was allowed
48 in the first retirement system in those cases to which this subdivision
49 shall apply, the transfer shall be deemed complete upon receipt by the
50 second retirement system of:
51 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to any
52 membership transfer initiated on or after January 1, 2023 for which
53 notice is received by the affected retirement systems or funds on a date
54 later than within one year on or after the effective date of this act or
55 within one year on or after the date of the membership transfer.
FISCAL NOTE.--Pursuant to Legislative Law, Section 50:

S. 8140--B 3
SUMMARY: This proposed bill would allow members of the Metropolitan
Transportation Authority 20-year Police Retirement Program (MTA PRP) to
transfer MTA service and assets to the New York City Police Pension Fund
(NYC PPF).
INCREASE OR (DECREASE) IN EMPLOYER CONTRIBUTIONS: The transfer of a
member's service and plan assets from the MTA PRP to the NYC PPF will
increase both the assets and liabilities of the NYC PPF.
To the extent that the assets transferred are more or less than the
increase in Present Value of Future Employer Contributions (PVFERC) due
to the transferred service, there will be a gain or loss.
The potential gains or losses to the NYC PPF would impact future
employer contributions, and the increase or decrease in employer
contributions would be allocated to New York City.
BACKGROUND: Currently, MTA PRP members cannot transfer their MTA
service to the NYC PPF. This proposed bill would allow MTA service to be
transferred to the NYC PPF subject to a one-year timing limitation. The
proposed bill also provides for a transfer of assets from the MTA PRP to
the NYC PPF.
The net increase in PVFERC is equal to the change in the Present Value
of Benefits (PVB) minus the change in the Present Value of Future
Employee Contributions (PVFEEC), minus the transferred assets. The net
increase in the PVFERC could be positive (loss), negative (gain) or
zero.
The assets transferred are equal to the Actuarial Accrued Liability
(AAL) for the member in the MTA PRP, which is equal to the member's
basic member contribution balance (BMCs) in the MTA PRP plus the net
pension reserve, if any. After the BMCs in the MTA PRP are transferred
to the NYC PPF, the NYC PPF member is no longer also a member in the MTA
PRP.
POTENTIAL GAINS / LOSSES: With respect to an individual member, the
additional cost of this proposed legislation could vary greatly depend-
ing on the member's length of service, age, and salary history. The
change in a member's PVFERC for the transferred service is based on
data, assumptions, methods, and plan provisions appropriate for the NYC
PPF.
The transferred assets are based on the AAL in the MTA PRP which is
determined based on data, assumptions, methods, and plan provisions
appropriate for the MTA PRP (not the NYC PPF).
The gain or loss to the NYC PPF depends on differences in liability
measurements between the MTA PRP and the NYC PPF, and on future invest-
ment experience associated with the transferred assets. Examples of
factors contributing to potential gains and/or losses include the
following:
* Differences in data.
* Differences in valuation assumptions.
* Differences in plan provisions.
* Future investment returns for the transferred assets.
ASSUMPTIONS AND METHODS: The analysis presented herein is based on the
Revised 2021 Actuarial Assumptions and Methods of the impacted retire-
ment system.
RISK AND UNCERTAINTY: The analysis presented in this Fiscal Note
depends highly on the actuarial assumptions, methods, and models used,
demographics of the impacted population, and other factors such as
investment, contribution, and other risks. If actual experience deviates
from actuarial assumptions, the actual costs could differ from those

S. 8140--B 4
presented herein. Quantifying these risks is beyond the scope of this
Fiscal Note.
This Fiscal Note is intended to measure pension-related impacts and
does not include other potential costs (e.g., administrative and Other
Postemployment Benefits). This Fiscal Note does not reflect any chapter
laws that may have been enacted during the current legislative session.
STATEMENT OF ACTUARIAL OPINION: Marek Tyszkiewicz and Gregory Zelikov-
sky are members of the Society of Actuaries and the American Academy of
Actuaries. We are members of NYCERS, but do not believe it impairs our
objectivity, and we meet the Qualification Standards of the American
Academy of Actuaries to render the actuarial opinion contained herein.
To the best of our knowledge, the results contained herein have been
prepared in accordance with generally accepted actuarial principles and
procedures and with the Actuarial Standards of Practice issued by the
Actuarial Standards Board.
FISCAL NOTE IDENTIFICATION: This Fiscal Note 2026-66 dated April 21,
2026 was prepared by the Chief Actuary for the New York City Retirement
Systems and Pension Funds and is intended for use only during the 2026
Legislative Session.
FISCAL NOTE.--Pursuant to Legislative Law, Section 50:
This bill would allow membership transfer from the Metropolitan Trans-
portation Authority Defined Benefit Pension Plan Police Retirement
Program (MTADBPP) to the New York State and Local Police and Fire
Retirement System (NYSLPFRS). For each membership transferred, the
MTADBPP member pension reserve will be paid to NYSLPFRS. To transfer,
the police officer must be an active member of NYSLPFRS.
The option to transfer membership from the MTADBPP to NYSLPFRS was
previously granted by Chapter 533 of the Laws of 2015.
Insofar as this bill affects NYSLPFRS, if enacted during the 2026
Legislative Session, we do not anticipate any costs to the participating
employers in NYSLPFRS.
Summary of relevant resources:
Membership data as of March 31, 2025 was used to measure the impact of
the bill, the same data used in the Actuarial Valuations dated April 1,
2025. Distributions and other statistics can be found in the 2025 Report
of the Actuary and the 2025 Annual Comprehensive Financial Report. The
actuarial assumptions and methods used are described in the 2025 Annual
Report to the Comptroller on Actuarial Assumptions, and the Codes, Rules
and Regulations of the State of New York: Audit and Control. The fair
value of assets and GASB disclosures can be found in the 2025 Financial
Statements and Supplementary Information.
Assumptions, demographics, and other considerations may have been
modified to better reflect specific provisions of any proposed benefit
change(s).
This fiscal note does not constitute a legal opinion on the viability
of the bill, nor is it intended to serve as a substitute for the profes-
sional judgment of an attorney.
This estimate, dated January 9, 2026, and intended for use only during
the 2026 Legislative Session, is Fiscal Note Number 2026-29. As Chief
Actuary of the New York State and Local Retirement System (NYSLRS), I,
Aaron Schottin Young, hereby certify that this analysis complies with
applicable Actuarial Standards of Practice as well as the Code of
Professional Conduct and Qualification Standards for Actuaries Issuing
Statements of Actuarial Opinion of the American Academy of Actuaries, of
which I am a member. I am a member of NYSLRS but do not believe it
impairs my objectivity.